Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 1.
General Provisions.

§ 20-146.1. Definitions.

In this act:

"Child"
means an individual who has not attained eighteen years of age.

"Child custody determination"
means a judgment, decree, or other order of a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child. The term includes a permanent, temporary, initial, or modification order. The term does not include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual.

"Child custody proceeding"
means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue. The term includes a proceeding for divorce, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, and protection from domestic violence, in which the issue may appear. The term does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, contractual emancipation, or enforcement under Article 3 (§ 20-146.22 et seq.) of this chapter.

"Commencement"
means the filing of the first pleading in a proceeding.

"Court"
means a court of competent jurisdiction as determined by otherwise applicable Virginia law to establish, enforce, or modify a child custody determination or an entity authorized under the law of another state to establish, enforce or modify a child custody determination.

"Home state"
means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding. In the case of a child less than six months of age, the term means the state in which the child lived from birth with any of the persons mentioned. A period of temporary absence of any of the mentioned persons is part of the period.

"Initial determination"
means the first child custody determination concerning a particular child.

"Issuing court"
means the court that makes a child custody determination for which enforcement is sought under this act.

"Issuing state"
means the state in which a child custody determination is made.

"Modification"
means a child custody determination that changes, replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a previous determination concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the previous determination.

"Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Person acting as a parent"
means a person, other than a parent, who has (i) physical custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of six consecutive months, including any temporary absence, within one year immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding and (ii) been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under the laws of this Commonwealth.

"Physical custody"
means the physical care and supervision of a child.

"State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Tribe"
means an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan Native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-125; 2001, c. 305.)

Uniform law cross references.

- For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala.
§§
30-3B-101 to 30-3B-405.

Alaska: Alaska Stat.
§§
25.30.300 to 25.30.910.

Arizona: A.R.S.
§§
25-1001 to 25-1067.

Arkansas: A.C.A.

§§

9-19-101 to 9-19-402.

California: California Fam. Code
§§
3400 to 3465.

Colorado: C.R.S.

§§

14-13-101 to 14-13-403.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat.
§§
46b-115 to 46b-115jj.

Delaware: 13 Del. C.
§§
1901 to 1943.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code
§§
16-4601.01 to 16-4605.03.

Florida: Fla. Stat.
§§
61.501 to 61.542.

Georgia: O.C.G.A.
§§
19-9-40 to 19-9-104.

Hawaii: H.R.S.
§§
583A-101 to 583A-317.

Idaho: Idaho Code
§§
32-11-101 to 32-11-405.

Illinois: 750 I.L.C.S. 36/101 to 750 I.L.C.S. 36/405.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann.

§§

31-21-1-1 through 31-21-7-3.

Iowa: Iowa Code
§§
598B.101 to 598B.402.

Kansas: K.S.A.
§§
23-37,101 through 23-37,405.

Kentucky: K.R.S.
§§
403.800 through 403.880.

Maine: 19-A M.R.S.
§§
1731 to 1783.

Maryland: Md. Family Law Code Ann.
§§
9.5-101 through 9.5-318.

Massachusetts: ALM GL ch. 209B,
§
1 et seq.

Michigan: M.C.L.S.
§§
722.1101 to 722.1405.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat.
§§
518D.101 to 518D.317.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann.
§§
93-27-101 through 93-27-402.

Missouri:
§§
452.700 to 452.930 R.S.Mo.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno.
§§
40-7-101 to 40-7-317.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb.
§§
43-1226 to 43-1266.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann.
§§
125A.005 to 125A.605.

New Hampshire: RSA
§
458-A:1 et seq.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat.
§§
2A:34-53 to 2A:34-95.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann.
§§
40-10A-101 to 40-10A-403.

New York: NY CLS Dom Rel
§§
75 to 78-a.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat.
§§
50A-101 to 50A-317.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code 14-14.1-01 to 14-14.1-37.

Ohio: O.R.C.
§§
3127.01 to 3127.53.

Oklahoma: 43 Okl. St.
§§
551-101 to 551-402.

Oregon: O.R.S.
§§
109.701 to 109.834.

Pennsylvania: 23 Pa.C.S.
§§
5401 to 5482.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws
§§
15-14.1-1 to 15-14.1-42.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann.
§§
63-15-300 to 63-15-394.

South Dakota S.D. Codified Laws
§§
26-5B-101 to 26-5B-403.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann.
§§
36-6-201 to 36-6-225.

Texas: Tex. Fam. Code
§§
152.001 to 152.317.

Utah: Utah Code
§§
78B-13-101 to 78B-13-318. Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 11 Depositions and Discovery.

§

11.06 Depositions.
Friend.

Vermont: 15 V.S.A.
§
1061 et seq.

Virgin Islands: 16 V.I.C.
§§
115 to 140o.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash.
§§
26.27.011 to 26.27.941.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code
§§
48-20-101 to 48-20-404.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat.
§§
822.01 to 822.25.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat.
§§
20-5-201 to 20-5-502.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2001, c. 305 enacted Chapter 7.1 of Title 20,
§§
20-146.1 through 20-146.38, the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, and repealed Chapter 7 of Title 20,

§§

20-125 through 20-146, the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections.

For table of comparable sections, see the table in Volume 10.

Official Comments in Chapter:

Copyright
c
rt 1997 by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. Reprinted with permission.

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980). For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For article on recent developments in Virginia domestic relations law, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 507 (1982). For note, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act: Dual Response to Interstate Child Custody Problems," see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 149 (1982). For article, "The Search for Guidance in Determining the Best Interests of the Child at Divorce: Reconciling the Primary Caretaker and Joint Custody Preferences," see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1985). For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998). For article, "Family Law," see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

Research References.

- Child Custody and Visitation Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 11 Depositions and Discovery.
§
11.06 Depositions. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 5-120 Answer to Complaint for Divorce Requesting Custody of Children Be Placed with Defendant, et seq.; No. 5-130 Affidavit under Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, et seq.

§ 20-146.2. Proceedings governed by other law.

This act does not govern an adoption proceeding or a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.3. Application to Indian tribes.

A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., is not subject to this act to the extent that it is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act.

A court of this Commonwealth shall treat a tribe as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying this article and Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter.

A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this act must be recognized and enforced under Article 3 (§ 20-146.22 et seq.) of this chapter.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.4. International application.

A court of this Commonwealth shall treat a foreign country as if it were a state of the United States for purposes of applying this article and Article 2 (§ 20-146.12 et seq.) of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, a child custody determination made in a foreign country under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this act must be recognized and enforced under Article 3 (§ 20-146.22 et seq.) of this chapter.

A court of this Commonwealth need not apply this act if the child custody law of a foreign country violates fundamental principles of human rights.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-146; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-146.5. Effect of child custody determination.

A child custody determination made by a court of this Commonwealth that had jurisdiction under this act binds all persons who have been served in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth or notified in accordance with § 20-146.7 or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court, and who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the determination is conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified by a court properly having jurisdiction.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-135; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

§ 20-146.6. Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this act is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon request of a party, must be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.7. Notice to persons outside state.

Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside this Commonwealth may be given in a manner prescribed by the law of this Commonwealth for service of process or by the law of the state in which the service is attempted or made. Notice may also be by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the last known address of the person to be served. Notice must be given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice and an opportunity to be heard but may be by publication pursuant to §§ 8.01-316 and 8.01-317 if other means are not effective.

Proof of service may be made in the manner prescribed by the law of this Commonwealth or by the law of the state in which the service is made.

Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

(1979, c. 229; 1982, c. 483, § 20-128; 2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

§ 20-146.8. Appearance and limited immunity.

A party to a child custody proceeding, including a modification proceeding, or a petitioner or respondent in a proceeding to enforce or register a child custody determination is not subject to personal jurisdiction in this Commonwealth for another proceeding or purpose solely by reason of having participated, or having been physically present for the purpose of participating, in the proceeding.

A person who is subject to personal jurisdiction in this Commonwealth on a basis other than physical presence is not immune from service of process in this Commonwealth. A party present in this Commonwealth who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state is not immune from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

The immunity granted by subsection A does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this act committed by an individual while present in this Commonwealth.

(2001, c. 305.)

Law review.

- For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

§ 20-146.9. Communication between courts.

Before finding and exercising jurisdiction, a court of this Commonwealth shall communicate with the court appearing to have jurisdiction in any other state concerning a proceeding arising under this act.

The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties are not able to participate in the communication, they must be given the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of the communication.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, a record must be made of a communication under this section. The parties must be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

For the purposes of this section,

"record"

means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.10. Taking testimony in another state.

In addition to other procedures available to a party, a party to a child custody proceeding may offer testimony of witnesses who are located in another state, including testimony of the parties and the child, by deposition or other means allowable in this Commonwealth for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a person be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is taken.

A court of this Commonwealth may permit an individual residing in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means before a designated court or at another location in that state. A court of this Commonwealth shall cooperate with courts of other states in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this Commonwealth by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

(1979, c. 229, § 20-141; 2001, c. 305.)

§ 20-146.11. Cooperation between courts; preservation of records.

A court of this Commonwealth may request the appropriate court of another state to:

Hold an evidentiary hearing;

Order a person to produce or give evidence pursuant to procedures of that state;

Order that an evaluation be made with respect to the custody of a child involved in a pending proceeding;

Forward to the court of this Commonwealth a certified copy of the transcript of the record of the hearing, the evidence otherwise presented, and any evaluation prepared in compliance with the request; and

Order a party to a child custody proceeding or any person having physical custody of the child to appear in the proceeding with or without the child.

Upon request of a court of another state, a court of this Commonwealth may hold a hearing or enter an order described in subsection A.

Travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under subsections A and B may be assessed against the parties according to the law of this Commonwealth.

A court of this Commonwealth shall preserve the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings, evaluations, and other pertinent records with respect to a child custody proceeding until the child attains eighteen years of age. Upon appropriate request by a court or law-enforcement official of another state, the court shall forward a certified copy of those records.

(1979, c. 229, §§ 20-142, 20-143, 20-144, 20-145; 2001, c. 305.)

Cross references.

- As to placement of child for adoption by parent or guardian, see
§
63.2-1230.

Law review.

- For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).